California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
If there is a deficit in the improvement fund of an assessment district during any fiscal year, the legislative body, from any available and unencumbered funds of the local agency, may provide for:

(a) A contribution to the improvement fund.

(b) A temporary advance to the improvement fund and direct that the advance be repaid from the next annual assessments levied and collected within the assessment district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 630.)
-------------------------------------------

22658.

The legislative body may accept contributions from any source toward payment of improvement costs. The legislative body, at any time either before or after the confirmation of the assessment, may provide for contributions towards payment of improvement costs from the funds of the local agency. All contributions shall be deposited in the improvement fund of the assessment district for which the contribution was provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 630.)
-------------------------------------------

22659.

All contributions authorized prior to confirmation of an assessment shall be deducted from the total improvement costs to be assessed within the assessment district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 630.)
-------------------------------------------

22660.

(a) The legislative body may, by resolution, determine that the estimated cost of any of the proposed improvements described in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 22525 is greater than can be conveniently raised from a single annual assessment and order that the estimated cost shall be raised by an assessment levied and collected in installments over a period not to exceed five fiscal years.

(b) The legislative body may, by resolution, determine that the estimated cost of the proposed improvements described in Section 22525 is greater than can be conveniently raised from a single annual assessment and order that the estimated cost of those improvements, other than the costs of maintenance and servicing, be raised by an assessment levied and collected in installments over a period not to exceed 30 years.

(c) The resolution adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall generally describe the proposed improvements, set forth the estimated cost thereof, specify the number of annual installments and the fiscal years during which they are to be collected, and fix or determine the maximum amount of each annual installment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

22661.

After adoption of a resolution providing for annual installment assessments, the engineer, in preparing reports required by Article 4 (commencing with Section 22565) of Chapter 1 of this part, shall include in the estimate and the assessment for each fiscal year specified in the resolution the total amount of the annual installment fixed or determined for such year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 630.)
-------------------------------------------

22662.

If a resolution providing for annual installment payments has been adopted, in the resolution or subsequent thereto, the legislative body may do any or a combination of the following:

(a) Provide for the accumulation of the moneys collected from the annual installments in the improvement fund until there is sufficient moneys to pay all or part of the cost of the improvements described in the resolution.

(b) Provide for a temporary advance to the improvement fund from any available and unencumbered funds of the local agency to pay all or part of the cost of the improvements described in the resolution and direct that the advance be repaid from the annual installments levied and collected during the fiscal years designated in the resolution.

(c) Borrow an amount necessary to finance the estimated cost of the proposed improvements. The amount borrowed, except for the amount borrowed pursuant to Section 22662.5, shall not exceed the amount of revenue estimated to be raised from the annual assessments levied over five fiscal years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1080, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

22662.5.

(a) The legislative body of any local agency may, by resolution, determine and declare that bonds shall be issued to finance the estimated cost of the proposed improvements described in Section 22525, other than the costs of maintenance and servicing, under either the Improvement Act of 1911 (Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000)) or the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500)). Either Part 5 (commencing with Section 6400) of Division 7 or Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500), as the case may be, shall govern all proceedings relating to the issuance of those bonds. The pertinent provisions of that division which apply to the legislative body of a city shall also apply to the legislative body of a special district formed to provide park and recreational services. Alternatively, the legislative body may determine and declare that notes shall be issued for the same purposes for which bonds may be issued. The maximum term to maturity of any notes issued shall not exceed 10 years.

(b) The resolution shall generally describe the proposed improvements specified in Section 22525, set forth the estimated cost thereof, specify the number of annual installments and the fiscal years during which they are to be collected, and fix or determine the maximum amount of each annual installment necessary to retire the bonds or notes. The amount of debt service to retire the bonds shall not exceed the amount of revenue estimated to be raised from assessments over 30 years. The amount of debt service to retire the notes shall not exceed the amount of revenue to be raised from the assessments over 10 years.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, assessments levied to pay the principal of, and interest on, any bond or note issued pursuant to this section, shall not be reduced or terminated if doing so would interfere with the timely retirement of the debt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 56, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22663.

Public property owned by any public agency and in use in the performance of a public function shall not be subject to assessment under this part unless the resolution of intention expressly provides that it shall be assessed. If the resolution provides that public property shall be assessed, the local agency conducting the proceedings shall be liable for payment of all amounts so assessed. Any such amounts shall be payable from the general fund of the local agency unless the resolution of intention designates some other fund. To the extent that any such amounts are paid by the public agency owning the public property, the local agency conducting the proceedings shall not be liable therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 630.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Claims and Actions [22675. - 22679.]

22675.

The validity of an assessment levied under this part for the purpose of raising revenue necessary to pay the debt service on bonds issued pursuant to Section 22662.5 shall not be contested in any action or proceeding, unless the action or proceeding is commenced within 30 days after the initial assessment is levied. Any appeal from a final judgment in the action or proceeding shall be perfected within 30 days after the entry of judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 31, Sec. 5.   Effective April 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

22679.

The legislative body may (a) provide for the construction or installation of any improvements authorized by Part 1 (commencing with Section 22000) of this division by proceedings taken pursuant to any other special assessment law or, in the case of a charter city, any procedural ordinance of the city and, (b) provide for the maintenance or servicing of those improvements by proceedings taken pursuant to Article 59 (commencing with Section 20890) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. The proceedings may be taken separately or combined. If combined, any of the several resolutions, reports, notices or other instruments provided for in Article 59 may be combined with those provided for in the other special assessment law or procedural ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 171.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 16. HIGHWAY DISTRICTS [25000. - 27567.]



PART 1. JOINT HIGHWAY DISTRICTS [25000. - 25521.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [25000. - 25006.]

25000.

This part may be cited as the Joint Highway District Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25001.

Unless the particular provision or the context otherwise requires, the definitions and general provisions contained in this chapter shall govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25002.

“District,” means a joint highway district, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25003.

“Improvement,” and any of its variants, includes the laying out, construction, improvement, and maintenance of public highways and appurtenances thereto, including tunnels which are incident to highway purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25004.

This part shall apply only to those districts which are organized or reorganized under this part and to those districts organized or reorganized on or after August 14, 1931, under the Joint Highway District Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25005.

All districts organized or existing prior to August 14, 1931, may continue their operations and the discharge of their obligations pursuant to the provisions of all laws appertaining to such districts in effect prior to that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25006.

This part shall be liberally construed, in order to effectuate its purposes. No error, defect, irregularity, informality and no neglect or omission of any officer or person, in any procedure taken under this part, which does not affect the jurisdiction of the board of directors to proceed shall render void or invalidate any proceeding hereunder, any bonds issued or levied, or taxes or assessment taxes levied or imposed hereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Organization and Reorganization of Districts [25025. - 25036.]

25025.

Districts, to be composed of two or more counties, may be created in accordance with this part for the purpose of improving public highways.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25026.

The board of supervisors of any county may initiate proceedings proposing the creation of a district by adopting a resolution reciting:

(a) That the public interest requires the improvement of one or more public highways and the acquisition of any necessary rights of way therefor.

(b) The general location and extent of the highways to be improved.

(c) That it is proposed to create a district composed of the counties of ____ (naming them) which will be benefited by the proposed improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25027.

Upon the adoption of the resolution the board of supervisors shall name and appoint one of its members to represent that county upon the board of directors of the district proposed to be organized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25028.

The clerk of the board of supervisors adopting the resolution shall transmit certified copies of the resolution to the clerk of the board of supervisors of each of the other counties named in the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25029.

Upon receipt of a copy of the resolution, the boards of supervisors of the several counties affected shall consider the advisability of creating and organizing a district as proposed in the resolution. After determining the facts involved, each of the boards of supervisors shall adopt a resolution either rejecting or approving the proposal to create the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25030.

Each resolution of approval shall, in addition to the matter otherwise required therein, name and appoint a member of the board of supervisors of the county adopting the resolution, to represent such county upon the board of directors of the proposed district. A certified copy of the resolution of approval shall be forthwith transmitted to the clerk of the board of supervisors initiating the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25031.

The adoption of the original resolution by the board of supervisors of the county initiating the proceedings shall constitute a sufficient approval in behalf of that county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25032.

After the receipt by the board of supervisors instituting the proceedings of a copy of the resolution approving the proposal from the board of supervisors of each county proposed to be included within the district, that board shall adopt a resolution declaring the district to be created and organized and setting forth the names of the counties composing the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25033.

The board of supervisors adopting the resolution declaring the creation and organization of the district shall file a certified copy of that resolution with the Secretary of State whereupon the district shall come into existence and shall have all of the powers granted in this part. The district shall constitute a public corporation and shall be known as “Joint Highway District No. ____ of the State of California.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25034.

The Secretary of State shall furnish and transmit to the clerk of the board of supervisors of the county adopting the initial resolution for the organization of the district a certificate of organization of the district. Within 10 days after the receipt of the certificate, the clerk shall notify (a) the clerks of the several boards of supervisors of the counties constituting the district, (b) the state Director of Transportation, and (c) each supervisor appointed as a member of the board of directors of the district that the district has been organized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 681, Sec. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

25035.

All districts shall be numbered by the Secretary of State, in the order of their creation and he shall keep and maintain in his office a list and register showing the districts organized under the provisions of this part or the Joint Highway District Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25036.

All districts organized or tentatively organized prior to August 14, 1931, may reorganize under this part. The board of directors of the district or tentative district proposing to reorganize under this part may adopt a resolution declaring its intention so to do. It shall then transmit a certified copy of the resolution to the boards of supervisors of the several counties composing the district for their approval. If the boards of supervisors of all of the counties composing the district consent to the reorganization, the board of directors of the district shall adopt a resolution setting forth such consent and declaring the district or tentative district reorganized under this part. Thereupon the reorganization shall be complete and the district shall thereafter conform to the provisions of this part and shall have all of the powers and duties in this part provided. A certified copy of the resolution declaring reorganization shall be transmitted to the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. General Powers of Districts [25050. - 25051.]

25050.

The district, acting through its board of directors, shall have power to:

(a) Improve public highways.

(b) Issue bonds and levy and impose taxes and assessment taxes upon property within the boundaries of the district.

(c) Accept in the name of the district all gifts, donations or contributions from any source whatsoever made to further the purposes of the district.

(d) Exercise the right of eminent domain for the purpose of acquiring lands or rights-of-way for any of the authorized purposes of the district.

(e) Acquire and use such personal property as may in the opinion of the board of directors be necessary for the exercise of the powers granted by this part. 

(f) Employ such labor and services as may in the opinion of the board of directors be necessary for the exercise of the powers granted by this part.

(g) Arrange for the safekeeping of all funds belonging to the district and appoint a treasurer and depositary or depositaries to keep the funds of the district and exact from such treasurer and depositary or depositaries such surety bonds or other security as the board of directors deems proper.

(h) Sue and be sued.

(i) Adopt a seal.

(j) Exercise all other powers expressly granted to it together with such powers as are reasonably implied therefrom and which are necessary and proper to carry out the objects and purposes of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 349.)
-------------------------------------------

25051.

The State, the counties composing the district, or any city within the district, may convey to the district such lands, public highways, or rights of way as may be utilized as part of, or in connection with, any highway which the district is authorized to improve.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1141.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. District Boards of Directors [25070. - 25078.]

25070.

The district shall be managed by, and the powers conferred upon the district shall be exercised by a board of directors appointed as provided in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25071.

The members of the board of directors shall serve during the pleasure of the appointing power. They shall receive no compensation for their services, but shall be allowed the actual expenses incurred by them in connection with the discharge of their duties under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25072.

The term of office of any member of the board of directors shall immediately cease upon the termination of the term of office of the director as a member of the board of supervisors of a county within the district, except in the case of a member appointed by the Director of Transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 108.)
-------------------------------------------

25073.

If an even number of counties comprise a district, an additional member of the board of directors shall be appointed by the directors already named in behalf of the several boards of supervisors. If the directors fail to make the appointment within 30 days after the date set for the first meeting of the board of directors, the secretary of the board shall, or any member thereof may, notify the Director of Transportation of that fact and he shall, within 30 days after receiving the notification, appoint a member of the board of supervisors of any county within the district, or a person residing in the district and owning real property within the boundaries thereof, to serve as the additional member of the board of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 109.)
-------------------------------------------

25074.

If a position on the board of directors becomes vacant, the vacancy shall be filled by the appointing authority whose appointee last held the position.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25075.

Within 10 days after the receipt of the certificate of organization of the district, the clerk of the initiatory board of supervisors shall notify the persons selected to serve as members of the board of directors of the district of the time and place at which the first meeting of the board shall be held. The clerk may select the place and fix any time within 30 days after the date of mailing notices for the holding of the first meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25076.

The persons appointed as members of the board of directors shall meet at the time and place fixed for the first meeting. A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business and in the absence of a quorum, any lesser number of directors may adjourn the meeting from time to time until a quorum is present.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25077.

At the first meeting the board of directors shall organize by selecting from among its membership a president, vice president and secretary. The officers thus selected shall severally perform such duties as the board may from time to time prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25078.

The board of directors shall fix a place or places within the district for the transaction of business. It may hold meetings from time to time in any place that will, in its opinion, best serve the interest or convenience of the board and of the public. The board of directors may make all necessary rules relative to the orderly transaction of its business and the business of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. District Officers and Employees [25100. - 25105.]

25100.

The board of directors shall appoint a treasurer and a district engineer, and may appoint an assistant secretary. The board may employ such clerical, legal, or additional engineering services as may in its discretion be required, and may fix the compensation to be paid to any officers or employees of the district. No officer of any county shall receive any compensation for services rendered in any capacity in behalf of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25101.

The treasurer shall be a resident of the district and a person competent in the handling of financial matters. Before entering upon the duties of his office, he shall furnish to the district a bond which is satisfactory in form and amount to the board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25102.

The treasurer shall have charge and custody of all of the funds of the district and he and his bondsmen shall be responsible for the safekeeping of those funds. He shall deposit all funds of the district in a depositary designated by the board of directors. He shall make report of the funds in his possession as required by the board of directors, and shall perform all the duties required of him by this part, and by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25103.

The district engineer shall be a qualified civil engineer, licensed to practice as such under the laws of this State. He shall perform all of the engineering services and duties required of him by this part and by the board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25104.

All engineering work performed in the district shall be done under the direction and control of the district engineer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25105.

If an assistant secretary is appointed, he shall perform such duties as the board of directors determine. He may during the absence of the secretary, or under his direction, perform all of the duties and functions of the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Contingent Fund [25120. - 25122.]

25120.

Immediately following the organization of the district, the several boards of supervisors of the counties composing the district shall provide the district with a sufficient contingent fund to enable the district and its officers to perform their prescribed functions and duties. The proportionate contributions of the several counties within the district may be suggested to the several boards of supervisors thereof by the board of directors of the district and the board of directors shall from time to time report to the said boards of supervisors its requirements and in general its expenditures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25121.

The boards of supervisors of the counties within the district may contribute to the contingent fund from any funds of the several counties not otherwise appropriated, including any moneys received from the State by the counties as a result of any tax or license upon motor vehicles or motor vehicle fuels. The State may contribute to the contingent fund any amount that it may desire out of any funds available for joint highway district purposes. The State may, through the director of public works, designate the purposes for which any money contributed by it to the contingent fund may be used and the purposes designated may be any which are authorized under the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25122.

The contingent fund may be used for the following purposes:

(a) For any purpose necessary to create and maintain the organization of the district.

(b) For making reconnaissance, preliminary and final location surveys.

(c) For all necessary or proper engineering, legal or clerical work incident to the organization and operation of the district.

(d) For the improvement of any public highway to be improved under this part. 

(e) For procuring any and all necessary lands or rights of way usable for the purposes for which the district is created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Preliminary Surveys and Report of District Projects [25150. - 25155.]

25150.

The board of directors shall as soon as practicable cause the route of the highway or highways proposed to be improved by the district, to be tentatively located. For this purpose the board may employ all necessary engineering and other assistance and shall have such preliminary surveys made as in the judgment of the board of directors may be required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25151.

The district engineer shall make a preliminary report to the board of directors setting forth the result of his preliminary surveys and showing the tentative location of the highway or highways proposed to be improved together with an estimate of the approximate cost of improvement, the incidental expenses thereof and the estimated cost of the acquisition of any necessary property or rights of way therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25152.

In his preliminary report the district engineer shall also recommend an apportionment of the construction and other costs among the State, if any contribution is to be requested from it, and the counties comprising the district. The district engineer shall also recommend a method or methods for financing the project. Upon completion of the preliminary report the district engineer shall file it with the secretary of the board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25153.

As soon as practicable after the filing of the engineer’s preliminary report, the board of directors shall give it full consideration and shall formulate a report of the project or projects for which the district is organized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25154.

The report of the board of directors shall contain the following:

(a) A general description of the approximate route and location of the highway or highways proposed to be improved.

(b) The estimated cost of the improvement.

(c) The general location and extent of any property or rights of way necessary for the entire improvement or for the improvement of the unit proposed to be immediately undertaken, together with the estimated cost of acquisition.

(d) A statement and recommendation of the portion or unit of the project which the board of directors recommends for immediate improvement, which may be the whole or any part of the project proposed.

(e) A statement of the estimated cost of each unit proposed to be immediately improved in the event that the board of directors determines upon the improvement of any unit less than the whole.

(f) A statement of the method of financing proposed by the board of directors. 

(g) A statement of the amount of contribution, if any, to be requested of the State.

(h) A statement of the proportionate amounts of the cost of the unit or units proposed to be borne within the several counties composing the district, after deducting any contribution to be made by the State.

(i) If any particular unit is proposed for immediate construction and that unit is less than the whole project, a statement of a proposed program for the improvement of the other units necessary to complete the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25155.

If highways are to be required or improved beyond the boundaries of the district, the consent of the governing body controlling the territory through which the proposed highways are to pass shall be first obtained.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. State Approval and Contribution [25175. - 25180.]

25175.

If the report of the project, as adopted by the board of directors, contains a request for contribution from the state, the board shall, immediately upon its adoption, file a certified copy thereof with the Director of Transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 110.)
-------------------------------------------

25176.

Within 90 days after its receipt, the Department of Transportation, through its proper officers, shall consider and pass upon the report so filed. It may approve or reject the request for contribution, and may reject, approve, or modify the report, in whole or in part, or may suggest modifications thereof. Failure of the department to act on the report within the 90-day period shall operate as a rejection on the part of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 111.)
-------------------------------------------

25177.

If the whole or any part of the project proposed in the report is approved and a contribution by the state is recommended, the California Transportation Commission shall thereupon adopt a resolution setting forth the amount of the contribution, the time and manner of payment thereof, and the purposes for which the contribution shall be used, and the state shall be committed and obligated to make the specified contribution out of any funds which are then or thereafter available for joint highway purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

25178.

The Director of Transportation shall issue and transmit to the secretary of the district a certificate of commitment showing the decision of his department upon the report and setting forth the amount of contribution, if any, and the terms relative to the payment thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 113.)
-------------------------------------------

25179.

The board of directors may amend its report of the project to conform with any suggestions, modifications, or recommendations of the Department of Transportation or the California Transportation Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 114.)
-------------------------------------------

25180.

The obligation of the State for any contribution shall be contingent upon the approval by all counties comprising the district of the balance of the costs of the project, or of the particular unit thereof proposed to be immediately improved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. County Approval and Contribution [25200. - 25209.]

25200.

Upon the receipt of the certificate of commitment from the Director of Transportation, or upon the adoption of the report if no contribution is requested from the state, the board of directors shall transmit certified copies of their report of the project to each of the boards of supervisors of the counties composing the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 115.)
-------------------------------------------

25201.

Upon receipt of the report of the project, each of the boards of supervisors shall forthwith consider it. Within 60 days after the receipt of the report, each board of supervisors shall by resolution approve or reject the report. Failure of any board of supervisors to act within the time allowed shall be deemed a rejection, but such rejection or a rejection by other means shall be without prejudice to the submission at any time of a new or amended report by the board of directors of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25202.

Each board of supervisors shall cause a certified copy of its resolution adopting or rejecting the report of the project to be sent to the secretary of the board of directors of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25203.

Upon receipt of the report of the project the clerk of each board of supervisors shall cause a notice to be published twice in a newspaper of general circulation published and circulated in the county receiving the report. The last publication of the notice shall be at least 20 days prior to the date of the hearing on the report. The notice shall set forth:

(a) That the report has been received and is on file for public inspection.

(b) The time at which the board of supervisors will consider the report and hold the hearing thereon.

(c) That all interested persons may present any protests or suggestions which they have to offer concerning the report at that time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25204.

No county within the district shall be obligated or committed hereunder until the board of supervisors thereof approves the report of the project and until that report is approved by the boards of supervisors of all other counties in the district. The proportions of contribution provided for in the report thus approved shall not be exceeded without the consent of the board of supervisors of each county in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25205.

At any time prior to the approval of the report of the project by the board of supervisors of any county, the matter of the participation of the county in any issuance of bonds proposed in the report may be referred to a vote of the qualified electors of the county. Such reference shall be had upon the petition of 5 per cent of the registered electors of the county, or upon the resolution of the board of supervisors of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25206.

The matter may be submitted at a special election called for that purpose or may be consolidated with any other election involving the entire county. All laws governing county elections shall apply to the election in so far as they may be applicable. The notice of election, in addition to the matters otherwise required, shall refer to the report of the project, a copy of which shall be on file in the office of the county elections official.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 135.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

25207.

If at the election a two-thirds majority of the electors voting thereon do not approve the proposition, the county shall not participate in the issue of bonds proposed in the report of the project unless the same or any amended proposition for such participation is thereafter, at a subsequent election, approved by the electors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25208.

If any county thus refers the matter of its participation in the issuance of bonds to the electors of the county, the time for the approval of the report by the board of supervisors of that county shall be extended to and including 30 days after the date of canvassing the returns upon the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25209.

The provisions of this chapter relating to the submission of the question of county participation in the issuance of bonds to the electors shall not apply to bonds issued under Chapter 19 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Final Surveys, Plans, Specifications and Drawings [25230. - 25262.]

25230.

After receiving the certificate of commitment for contribution by the State, if any, and certified copies of the resolutions of approval of the boards of supervisors of all of the counties comprising the district, the board of directors of the district may proceed with final surveys, the preparation of final plans and specifications, the award of contracts and the acquisition and improvement of the highway or highways constituting the project or the unit thereof which has been approved for immediate construction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25231.

In proceeding with a project, or unit thereof, the board of directors shall have all necessary final surveys, plans, specifications and detailed drawings prepared by the district engineer. Upon completion thereof the surveys, plans, specifications and detailed drawings shall be filed with and approved by the board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25232.
